Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.17 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Except as provided for in subsection C of this section,


beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, in order to graduate from


a public high school accredited by the State Board of Education,


students shall complete instruction on the growth and development of


an unborn person by watching an ultrasound video, a computer-


generated ultrasound, or an instructional video showing the stages

Req. No. 2188 Page 1


of an unborn person’s development that is produced by a non-profit


human rights organization. The video or ultrasound shall be a


minimum of three (3) minutes in length.


B. The instruction required by subsection A of this section may


be integrated into one or more existing subjects.


C. School district superintendents, or their designees, shall


provide prior written notification to the parents or legal guardians


of students one week prior to administration of the instruction


required by subsection A of this section. The notification shall


include information on how a parent or legal guardian may opt a


student out of the instruction. A student who is opted out of the


instruction pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall not


be subject to any disciplinary procedures.


D. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2188 EB 1/15/2026 7:28:02 AM





Req. No. 2188 Page 2